Florida, session 2026, SB482.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 159 160 Section 1.âPresent paragraphs (a) through (d) of subsection 161 (1) and present subsection (7) of section 287.138, Florida 162 Statutes, are redesignated as paragraphs (b) through (e) and 163 subsection (8), respectively, a new paragraph (a) is added to 164 subsection (1), a new subsection (7) is added to that section, 165 and subsection (3) of that section is amended, to read: 166 287.138âContracting with entities of foreign countries of 167 concern prohibited.â 168 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 169 (a)ââArtificial intelligenceâ means a machine-based system 170 that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make 171 predictions, recommendations, or decisions influencing real or 172 virtual environments. 173 (3)(a)âBeginning July 1, 2025, a governmental entity may 174 not extend or renew a contract with an entity listed in 175 paragraphs (2)(a)-(c) if the contract would give such entity 176 access to an individualâs personal identifying information. 177 Beginning July 1, 2026, a governmental entity may not extend or 178 renew a contract with an entity listed in paragraph (7)(a), 179 paragraph (7)(b), or paragraph (7)(c). 180 (b)âBeginning July 1, 2026, a governmental entity may not 181 accept a bid on, a proposal for, or a reply to, or enter into a 182 contract with, an entity to provide artificial intelligence 183 technology, software, or products, including as a portion or an 184 option to the products or services provided under the contract, 185 unless the entity provides the governmental entity with an 186 affidavit signed by an officer or a representative of the entity 187 under penalty of perjury attesting that the entity does not meet 188 any of the criteria in paragraph (7)(a), paragraph (7)(b), or 189 paragraph (7)(c). 190 (7)âA governmental entity may not knowingly enter into a 191 contract with an entity for artificial intelligence technology, 192 software, or products, including as a portion or an option to 193 the products or services provided under the contract, if: 194 (a)âThe entity is owned by the government of a foreign 195 country of concern; 196 (b)âA government of a foreign country of concern has a 197 controlling interest in the entity; or 198 (c)âThe entity is organized under the laws of or has its 199 principal place of business in a foreign country of concern. 200 Section 2.âThe Division of Law Revision is directed to 201 create part IX of chapter 501, Florida Statutes, consisting of 202 ss. 501.9981, 501.9982, 501.9983, 501.9984, 501.9985, 501.9986, 203 and 501.9987, Florida Statutes, to be entitled the âArtificial 204 Intelligence Bill of Rights.â 205 Section 3.âSection 501.9981, Florida Statutes, is created 206 to read: 207 501.9981âShort title.âThis part may be cited as the 208 âArtificial Intelligence Bill of Rights.â 209 Section 4.âSection 501.9982, Florida Statutes, is created 210 to read: 211 501.9982âRights relating to the use of artificial 212 intelligence.â 213 (1)âResidents are entitled to certain rights with respect 214 to the use of artificial intelligence, including, but not 215 limited to: 216 (a)âThe right to use artificial intelligence to improve 217 their own lives and the lives of family members, fellow 218 residents, and the world at large in accordance with the law. 219 (b)âThe right to supervise, access, limit, and control 220 their minor childrenâs use of artificial intelligence. 221 (c)âThe right to know whether they are communicating with a 222 human being or an artificial intelligence system, program, or 223 chatbot. 224 (d)âThe right to know whether artificial intelligence 225 technology companies are collecting personal information or 226 biometric data, and the right to expect artificial intelligence 227 technology companies to protect and deidentify that information 228 or data in accordance with the law. 229 (e)âThe right to pursue civil remedies authorized by law 230 against persons who use artificial intelligence to appropriate 231 the name, image, or likeness of others for commercial purposes 232 without their consent. 233 (f)âThe right to be protected by law from criminal acts, 234 such as fraud, exploitation, identity theft, stalking, and 235 cyberbullying, regardless of whether artificial intelligence is 236 used in the commission of those acts. 237 (g)âThe right to be protected by law from criminal acts 238 relating to the alteration of existing images to create sexual 239 or lewd or lascivious images or child pornography, regardless of 240 whether artificial intelligence is used in the commission of 241 those acts. 242 (h)âThe right to know whether political advertisements, 243 electioneering communications, or similar advertisements were 244 created in whole or in part with the use of artificial 245 intelligence. 246 (i)âThe right to pursue civil remedies authorized by law 247 against others who use artificial intelligence to slander, 248 libel, or defame them. 249 (j)âThe right to prevent a companion chatbot from engaging 250 with a user as a character that is protected by federal 251 copyright law without the express written consent of the 252 copyright owner. 253 (k)âThe right to prevent a companion chatbot from engaging 254 with a user as a character that is a living individual without 255 the express written consent of that individual. 256 (l)âThe right to prevent generative artificial intelligence 257 from using a character that is protected by federal copyright 258 law without the express written consent of the copyright owner. 259 (2)âResidents may exercise the rights described in this 260 section in accordance with existing law. This section may not be 261 construed as creating new or independent rights or entitlements. 262 Section 5.âSection 501.9983, Florida Statutes, is created 263 to read: 264 501.9983âDefinitions.âAs used in this part, the term: 265 (1)ââAccount holderâ means an individual who opens an 266 account or creates a profile or is identified by the companion 267 chatbot platform by a unique identifier while he or she is using 268 or accessing the platform, if the platform knows or has reason 269 to believe the individual is a resident of this state. 270 (2)ââArtificial intelligenceâ means a machine-based system 271 that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make 272 predictions, recommendations, or decisions influencing real or 273 virtual environments. 274 (3)ââArtificial intelligence technology companyâ means a 275 business or organization that produces, develops, creates, 276 designs, or manufactures artificial intelligence technology or 277 products, collects data for use in artificial intelligence 278 products, or implements artificial intelligence technology. 279 (4)ââBotâ means an automated online software application in 280 which all or substantially all of the actions or posts of the 281 account are not the result of a natural person. 282 (5)ââCompanion chatbotâ means an artificial intelligence 283 system with a natural language interface that provides adaptive, 284 human-like responses to user inputs and is capable of meeting a 285 userâs social needs by retaining information on prior 286 interactions or user sessions and user preferences to 287 personalize the interaction and facilitate ongoing engagement, 288 asking unprompted or unsolicited emotion-based questions that go 289 beyond a direct response to a user prompt, and sustaining an 290 ongoing dialogue personalized to the user. The term does not 291 include: 292 (a)âA chatbot used only for customer service; a businessâs 293 internal operational purposes, productivity and analysis; or 294 uses related to source information, internal research, or 295 technical assistance; 296 (b)âA chatbot that is a feature of a video game or theme 297 park and is limited to replies related to the video game or 298 theme park experience and does not discuss topics related to 299 mental health, self-harm, or material harmful to minors or 300 maintain a dialogue on other topics unrelated to the video game 301 or theme park; 302 (c)âA stand-alone consumer electronic device that functions 303 as a speaker and voice command interface, acts as a voice 304 activated virtual assistant, and does not sustain a relationship 305 across multiple interactions or generate outputs likely to 306 elicit emotional responses in the user; or 307 (d)âAn artificial intelligence instructional tool, as 308 defined in s. 1006.1495. 309 (6)ââCompanion chatbot platformâ means a platform that 310 allows a user to engage with companion chatbots. 311 (7)ââDeidentified dataâ means data that cannot reasonably 312 be linked to an identified or identifiable individual or a 313 device linked to that individual. 314 (8)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Legal Affairs. 315 (9)ââMaterial harmful to minorsâ has the same meaning as in 316 s. 501.1737(1). 317 (10)ââMinorâ means any person 17 years of age or younger. 318 (11)ââOperatorâ means a person who owns, operates, or 319 otherwise makes available a bot to individuals in this state. 320 (12)ââPop-upâ means a visible notification on the computer, 321 tablet, or smartphone screen of a user which may be resolved if 322 the user interacts with or responds to the notification. 323 (13)ââResidentâ means an individual who has resided in this 324 state for more than 6 months during the preceding 12-month 325 period. 326 (14)ââTheme parkâ has the same meaning as the term theme 327 park or entertainment complex as defined in s. 509.013. 328 (15)ââUserâ means an individual who resides or is domiciled 329 in this state and who accesses an Internet website, online or 330 cloud-computing service, online application, or mobile 331 application. 332 (16)ââVideo gameâ means a game played on an electronic 333 amusement device that uses a computer, microprocessor, or 334 similar electronic circuitry and its own monitor, or is designed 335 to be used with a television set or a computer monitor, to 336 interact with the user of the device. 337 Section 6.âSection 501.9984, Florida Statutes, is created 338 to read: 339 501.9984âCompanion chatbot use for minors.â 340 (1)âA companion chatbot platform shall prohibit a minor 341 from becoming or being an account holder unless the minorâs 342 parent or guardian provides consent. If a companion chatbot 343 platform allows a minor to become or be an account holder, the 344 parties have entered into a contract. 345 (a)âIf the minorâs parent or guardian provides consent for 346 the minor to become an account holder or maintain an existing 347 account, the companion chatbot platform must allow the 348 consenting parent or guardian of the minor account holder to: 349 1.âReceive copies of all past or present interactions 350 between the account holder and the companion chatbot; 351 2.âLimit the amount of time that the account holder may 352 interact with the companion chatbot each day; 353 3.âLimit the days of the week and the times during the day 354 when the account holder may interact with the companion chatbot; 355 4.âDisable any of the interactions between the account 356 holder and third-party account holders on the companion chatbot 357 platform; and 358 5.âReceive timely notifications if the account holder 359 expresses to the companion chatbot a desire or an intent to 360 engage in harm to self or others. 361 (b)âA companion chatbot platform shall do all of the 362 following: 363 1.âTerminate any account or identifier belonging to an 364 account holder who is a minor if the companion chatbot platform 365 treats or categorizes the account or identifier as belonging to 366 a minor for purposes of targeting content or advertising and if 367 the minorâs parent or guardian has not provided consent for the 368 minor pursuant to subsection (1). The companion chatbot platform 369 shall provide 90 days for the account holder to dispute the 370 termination. Termination must be effective upon the expiration 371 of the 90 days if the account holder fails to effectively 372 dispute the termination. 373 2.âAllow an account holder who is a minor to request to 374 terminate the account or identifier. Termination must be 375 effective within 5 business days after the request. 376 3.âAllow the consenting parent or guardian of an account 377 holder who is a minor to request that the minorâs account or 378 identifier be terminated. Termination must be effective within 379 10 business days after the request. 380 4.âPermanently delete all personal information held by the 381 companion chatbot platform relating to the terminated minor 382 account or identifier, unless state or federal law requires the 383 platform to maintain the information. 384 (2)âIn connection to all accounts or identifiers held by 385 account holders who are minors, the companion chatbot platform 386 shall do all of the following: 387 (a)âDisclose to the account holder that he or she is 388 interacting with artificial intelligence. 389 (b)âProvide by default a clear and conspicuous notification 390 to the account holder, at the beginning of companion chatbot 391 interactions and at least once every hour during continuing 392 interactions, reminding the minor to take a break and that the 393 companion chatbot is artificially generated and not human. 394 (c)âInstitute reasonable measures to prevent the companion 395 chatbot from producing or sharing materials harmful to minors or 396 encouraging the account holder to engage in any of the conduct 397 described or depicted in materials harmful to minors. 398 (3)âA knowing or reckless violation of this section is 399 deemed a deceptive or unfair trade practice or act actionable 400 under part II of this chapter solely by the department against a 401 companion chatbot platform. If the department has reason to 402 believe that a companion chatbot platform is in violation of 403 this section, the department, as the enforcing authority, may 404 bring an action against such platform for a deceptive or unfair 405 trade practice or act. In addition to other remedies under part 406 II of this chapter, the department may collect a civil penalty 407 of up to $50,000 per violation and reasonable attorney fees and 408 court costs. If the companion chatbot platformâs failure to 409 comply with this section is part of a consistent pattern of 410 knowing or reckless conduct, punitive damages may be assessed 411 against the companion chatbot platform. 412 (4)(a)âAfter the department has notified a companion 413 chatbot platform in writing of an alleged violation, the 414 department may grant the companion chatbot platform 45 calendar 415 days to cure the alleged violation and may issue a letter of 416 guidance stating that the companion chatbot platform will not be 417 offered another 45-calendar-day cure period for any future 418 violations of this section. The department may consider the 419 number and frequency of violations, the substantial likelihood 420 of injury to the public, and the safety of persons or property 421 in determining whether to grant the companion chatbot platform 422 45 calendar days to cure and issue the letter of guidance. 423 1.âThe 45-calendar-day cure period does not apply to an 424 alleged violation where the companion chatbot platform willfully 425 or knowingly disregarded the account holderâs age. 426 2.âFor an alleged violation of paragraph (2)(c), the 427 companion chatbot platform may provide for the departmentâs 428 consideration information that shows that the reasonable 429 measures taken by the platform include controls aligned with the 430 latest versions of the National Institute of Standards and 431 Technology AI Risk Management Framework, ISO 42001. Such 432 information may include structured interaction logs, status of 433 parental access controls, harm-signal detection and response 434 procedures enacted, and verified deletion events. 435 (b)âIf the alleged violation is cured to the satisfaction 436 of the department, and proof of such cure is provided to the 437 department, the department may not bring an action for the 438 alleged violation but may issue a letter of guidance stating 439 that the companion chatbot platform will not be offered a 45 440 calendar-day cure period for any future violations of this 441 section. 442 (c)âIf the companion chatbot platform fails to cure the 443 alleged violation within 45 calendar days, the department may 444 bring an action against such companion chatbot platform for the 445 alleged violation. 446 (5)(a)âA companion chatbot platform that knowingly or 447 recklessly violates this section is liable to a minor account 448 holder for up to $10,000 in damages plus court costs and 449 reasonable attorney fees as ordered by the court. 450 (b)âA civil action for a claim under this subsection must 451 be brought within 1 year after the date the complainant knew, or 452 reasonably should have known, of the alleged violation. 453 (c)âAn action brought under this subsection may be brought 454 only on behalf of a minor account holder. 455 (6)âFor purposes of bringing an action under this section, 456 a companion chatbot platform that allows a minor to become or be 457 an account holder on the platform is considered to be both 458 engaged in substantial and not isolated activities within this 459 state and operating, conducting, engaging in, or carrying on a 460 business, and doing business in this state, and is therefore 461 subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state. 462 (7)âThis section does not preclude any other available 463 remedy at law or equity. 464 (8)âThe department may adopt rules to implement this 465 section. 466 Section 7.âSection 501.9985, Florida Statutes, is created 467 to read: 468 501.9985âConsumer protections regarding bots.â 469 (1)âAt the beginning of an interaction between a user and a 470 bot, and at least once every hour during the interaction, an 471 operator shall display a pop-up message or other prominent 472 notification notifying the user or, if the interaction is not 473 through a device with a screen, otherwise inform the user, that 474 he or she is not engaging in dialogue with a human counterpart. 475 This section does not apply to a bot that is used solely by 476 employees within a business for its internal operational 477 purposes. 478 (2)âA violation of this section is deemed a deceptive or 479 unfair trade practice or act actionable under part II of this 480 chapter solely by the department on behalf of a user of a bot. 481 If the department has reason to believe that an operator is in 482 violation of this section, the department, as the enforcing 483 authority, may bring an action against the operator for a 484 deceptive or unfair trade practice or act. For the purpose of 485 bringing an action pursuant to this section, ss. 501.211 and 486 501.212 do not apply. In addition to any other remedy under part 487 II of this chapter, the department may collect a civil penalty 488 of up to $50,000 per violation and reasonable attorney fees and 489 court costs. 490 (3)(a)âAfter the department has notified an operator in 491 writing of an alleged violation, the department may grant the 492 operator 45 calendar days to cure the alleged violation and may 493 issue a letter of guidance stating that the companion chatbot 494 platform will not be offered another 45-calendar-day cure period 495 for any future violations. The department may consider the 496 number and frequency of violations, the substantial likelihood 497 of injury to the public, and the safety of persons or property 498 in determining whether to grant an operator 45 calendar days to 499 cure and issue the letter of guidance. 500 (b)âFor an alleged violation of this section, the operator 501 may provide for the departmentâs consideration information that 502 demonstrates that the operator provides persistent and 503 conspicuous identity indicators and accessible disclosures which 504 are in conformity with the latest versions of the National 505 Institute of Standards and Technology AI Risk Management 506 Framework, ISO 42001. 507 (c)âIf the alleged violation is cured to the satisfaction 508 of the department and proof of such cure is provided to the 509 department, the department may not bring an action for the 510 alleged violation but may issue a letter of guidance that 511 indicates that the operator will not be offered a 45-calendar 512 day cure period for any future violations. 513 (d)âIf the operator fails to cure the alleged violation 514 within the 45-calendar-day cure period, the department may bring 515 an action against such operator for the alleged violation. 516 (4)âFor purposes of bringing an action pursuant to this 517 section, an operator that owns, operates, or otherwise makes 518 available a bot to individuals in this state is considered to be 519 both engaged in substantial and not isolated activities within 520 this state and operating, conducting, engaging in, or carrying 521 on a business, and doing business in this state, and is 522 therefore subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this 523 state. 524 (5)âThe department may adopt rules to implement this 525 section. 526 Section 8.âSection 501.9986, Florida Statutes, is created 527 to read: 528 501.9986âConsumer protections regarding deidentified data.â 529 (1)âAn artificial intelligence technology company may not 530 sell or disclose personal information of users unless the 531 information is deidentified data. This subsection does not 532 prohibit the sale or disclosure of information specifically 533 authorized by federal law. 534 (2)âAn artificial intelligence technology company in 535 possession of deidentified data shall do all of the following: 536 (a)âTake reasonable measures to ensure that the data cannot 537 be associated with a user. 538 (b)âMaintain and use the data in deidentified form. An 539 artificial intelligence technology company may not attempt to 540 reidentify the data, except that the artificial intelligence 541 technology company may attempt to reidentify the data solely for 542 the purpose of determining whether its deidentification 543 processes satisfy the requirements of this section. 544 (c)âContractually obligate a recipient of the deidentified 545 data to comply with this section. 546 (d)âImplement business processes to prevent the inadvertent 547 release of deidentified data. 548 (3)âA violation of this section is deemed a deceptive or 549 unfair trade practice or act actionable under part II of this 550 chapter solely by the department. If the department has reason 551 to believe that an artificial intelligence technology company is 552 in violation of this section, the department, as the enforcing 553 authority, may bring an action against the artificial 554 intelligence technology company for a deceptive or unfair trade 555 practice or act. For the purpose of bringing an action pursuant 556 to this section, ss. 501.211 and 501.212 do not apply. In 557 addition to any other remedy under part II of this chapter, the 558 department may collect a civil penalty of up to $50,000 per 559 violation and reasonable attorney fees and court costs. 560 (4)(a)âAfter the department has notified an artificial 561 intelligence technology company in writing of an alleged 562 violation, the department may grant the artificial intelligence 563 technology company 45 calendar days to cure the alleged 564 violation and may issue a letter of guidance stating that the 565 artificial intelligence technology company will not be offered 566 another 45-calendar-day cure period for any future violations. 567 The department may consider the number and frequency of 568 violations, the substantial likelihood of injury to the public, 569 and the safety of persons or property in determining whether to 570 grant the artificial intelligence technology company 45 calendar 571 days to cure and issue the letter of guidance. 572 (b)âFor an alleged violation of this section, the 573 artificial intelligence technology company may provide for the 574 departmentâs consideration information that shows that the 575 artificial intelligence technology company maintains a risk 576 management program that: 577 1.âValidates the companyâs information security and privacy 578 controls against a recognized framework aligned with the latest 579 versions of the National Institute of Standards and Technology 580 AI Risk Management Framework, ISO 42001; and 581 2.âIncludes assessed controls for deidentification, 582 contractual flow-down, non-reidentification, inadvertent release 583 prevention, monitoring, and auditing sufficient to demonstrate 584 that the company is taking reasonable measures to meet the 585 requirements of this section. 586 (c)âIf the alleged violation is cured to the satisfaction 587 of the department and proof of such cure is provided to the 588 department, the department may not bring an action for the 589 alleged violation but may issue a letter of guidance that 590 indicates that the artificial intelligence technology company 591 will not be offered another 45-calendar-day cure period for any 592 future violations. 593 (d)âIf the artificial intelligence technology company fails 594 to cure the alleged violation within the 45-calendar-day cure 595 period, the department may bring an action against such 596 artificial intelligence technology company for the alleged 597 violation. 598 (5)âFor purposes of bringing an action pursuant to this 599 section, an artificial intelligence technology company that 600 produces, develops, creates, designs, or manufactures artificial 601 intelligence technology or products, collects data for use in 602 artificial intelligence products, or implements artificial 603 intelligence technology in this state is considered to be both 604 engaged in substantial and not isolated activities within this 605 state and operating, conducting, engaging in, or carrying on a 606 business, and doing business in this state, and is therefore 607 subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state. 608 (6)âThe department may adopt rules to implement this 609 section. 610 Section 9.âSection 501.9987, Florida Statutes, is created 611 to read: 612 501.9987âInvestigations.â 613 (1)âIf, by its own inquiry or as a result of complaints, 614 the department has reason to believe that a person has engaged 615 in, or is engaging in, a practice or an act that violates this 616 part, the department may administer oaths and affirmations, 617 subpoena witnesses or matter, and collect evidence. Within 5 618 days, excluding weekends and legal holidays, after service of a 619 subpoena, or at any time before the return date specified in the 620 subpoena, whichever time period is longer, the party served may 621 file in the circuit court in the county in which it resides or 622 in which it transacts business and serve upon the enforcing 623 authority a petition for an order modifying or setting aside the 624 subpoena. The petitioner may raise any objection or privilege 625 that would be available upon service of a subpoena in a civil 626 action. The subpoena must inform the party served of the partyâs 627 rights under this subsection. 628 (2)âIf the matter that the department seeks to obtain by 629 subpoena is located outside this state, the person subpoenaed 630 may make the matter available to the department or its 631 representative at the place where it is located. The department 632 may designate representatives, including officials of the state 633 in which the matter is located, to inspect the matter on its 634 behalf and may respond to similar requests from officials of 635 other states. 636 (3)âUpon the failure of a person, without lawful excuse, to 637 obey a subpoena and upon reasonable notice to all persons 638 affected, the department may apply to the circuit court for an 639 order compelling compliance. 640 (4)âThe department may request that a person who refuses to 641 comply with a subpoena on the grounds that the testimony or 642 matter may be self-incriminating be ordered by the court to 643 provide the testimony or matter. Except in a prosecution for 644 perjury, a person who complies with a court order to provide 645 testimony or matter after asserting a valid privilege against 646 self-incrimination may not have the testimony or matter so 647 provided, or evidence derived from the testimony or matter, 648 received against the person in any criminal investigation or 649 proceeding. 650 (5)âA person upon whom a subpoena is served pursuant to 651 this part must comply with its terms unless otherwise provided 652 by order of the court. A person who fails to appear, with the 653 intent to avoid, evade, or prevent compliance in whole or in 654 part with an investigation under this part, or who removes from 655 any place, conceals, withholds, mutilates, alters, or destroys, 656 or by any other means falsifies any documentary material in the 657 possession, custody, or control of a person subject to a 658 subpoena, or who knowingly conceals relevant information with 659 the intent to avoid, evade, or prevent compliance, is liable for 660 a civil penalty of not more than $5,000 per week in violation, 661 reasonable attorney fees, and costs. 662 (6)âThe department may adopt rules to implement this 663 section. 664 Section 10.âSection 540.08, Florida Statutes, is amended to 665 read: 666 540.08âUnauthorized publication of name, image, or 667 likeness.â 668 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 669 (a)ââGenerative artificial intelligenceâ means a machine 670 based system that can, for a given set of human-defined 671 objectives, emulate the structure and characteristics of input 672 data in order to generate derived synthetic content, including 673 images, videos, audio, text, and other digital content. 674 (b)ââPersonâ has the same meaning as in s. 1.01. 675 (c)ââServicememberâ has the same meaning as in s. 250.01 676 and includes any officer or enlisted member who died from 677 service-connected causes while on active duty. 678 (d)ââSurviving childrenâ means an individualâs immediate 679 offspring and any children legally adopted by the individual. 680 (e)ââSurviving spouseâ means an individualâs surviving 681 spouse under the law of the individualâs domicile at the time of 682 the individualâs death, regardless of whether the spouse later 683 remarried. 684 (2)âA person may not publish, print, display, or otherwise 685 publicly use for trade or for any commercial or advertising 686 purpose the name, portrait, photograph, image, or other likeness 687 of an individual created through generative artificial 688 intelligence without the express written or oral consent to such 689 use given by any of the following: 690 (a)âThe individual. 691 (b)âAny other person authorized in writing by the 692 individual to license the commercial use of the individualâs 693 name, image, or likeness. 694 (c)âIf the individual is deceased: 695 1.âA person authorized in writing to license the commercial 696 use of the individualâs name, image, or likeness; or 697 2.âIf a person is not authorized, any one individual from a 698 class composed of the deceased individualâs surviving spouse and 699 surviving children. A legal parent or guardian may give consent 700 on behalf of a minor surviving child. 701 (3)âA No person may not shall publish, print, display or 702 otherwise publicly use for purposes of trade or for any 703 commercial or advertising purpose the name, portrait, 704 photograph, image, or other likeness of an individual any 705 natural person without the express written or oral consent to 706 such use given by any of the following: 707 (a)âThe individual. Such person; or 708 (b)âAny other person, firm or corporation authorized in 709 writing by the individual such person to license the commercial 710 use of the individualâs her or his name, image, or likeness.; or 711 (c)âIf the individual such person is deceased:, 712 1.âA any person, firm or corporation authorized in writing 713 to license the commercial use of the deceased individualâs her 714 or his name, image, or likeness;, or 715 2.âIf a no person, firm or corporation is not so 716 authorized, then by any one individual from among a class 717 composed of the individualâs her or his surviving spouse and 718 surviving children. A legal parent or guardian may give consent 719 on behalf of a minor surviving child. 720 (4)(2)âIf In the event the consent required in subsection 721 (2) or subsection (3) (1) is not obtained, the individual person 722 whose name, portrait, photograph, image, or other likeness is so 723 used, or a any person, firm, or corporation authorized by the 724 individual such person in writing to license the commercial use 725 of the individualâs her or his name, image, or likeness, or, if 726 the individual person whose likeness is used is deceased, a any 727 person, firm, or corporation having the right to give such 728 consent, as provided in subsection (2) or subsection (3) 729 hereinabove, may bring an action to enjoin the such unauthorized 730 publication, printing, display, or other public use, and to 731 recover damages for any loss or injury resulting from the 732 unauthorized publication sustained by reason thereof, including 733 an amount that which would have been a reasonable royalty, and 734 punitive or exemplary damages. 735 (5)(3)âIf a person uses the name, portrait, photograph, 736 image, or other likeness of a servicemember member of the armed 737 forces without obtaining the consent required in subsection (2) 738 or subsection (3) (1) and the such use is not subject to an any 739 exception listed in this section, a court may impose a civil 740 penalty of up to $1,000 per violation in addition to the civil 741 remedies contained in subsection (4) (2). Each commercial 742 transaction constitutes a violation under this section. As used 743 in this section, the term âmember of the armed forcesâ means an 744 officer or enlisted member of the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine 745 Corps, Space Force, or Coast Guard of the United States, the 746 Florida National Guard, and the United States Reserve Forces, 747 including any officer or enlisted member who died as a result of 748 injuries sustained in the line of duty. 749 (6)(4)âThe provisions of This section does shall not apply 750 to any of the following: 751 (a)âThe publication, printing, display, or use of the name, 752 portrait, photograph, image, or other likeness of an individual 753 any person in a any newspaper, magazine, book, news broadcast or 754 telecast, radio broadcast, or other news medium or publication 755 if used as part of a any bona fide news report or presentation 756 having a current and legitimate public interest and if the where 757 such name, image, or likeness is not used for advertising 758 purposes.; 759 (b)âThe publication, printing, display, or use of the name, 760 portrait, photograph, image, or other likeness of an individual 761 created through generative artificial intelligence in a 762 newspaper, magazine, book, news broadcast or telecast, radio 763 broadcast, or other news medium or publication if the generative 764 artificial intelligence is used as part of a bona fide news 765 report or presentation and that report or presentation contains 766 a clear acknowledgement of speculation regarding the 767 authenticity of the materials which are the subject of the 768 report or presentation. 769 (c)âThe use of an individualâs such name, portrait, 770 photograph, image, or other likeness in connection with the 771 resale or other distribution of literary, musical, or artistic 772 productions or other articles of merchandise or property with 773 the individualâs consent where such person has consented to the 774 use of her or his name, portrait, photograph, or likeness on or 775 in connection with the initial sale or distribution of the 776 productions, articles, or merchandise. thereof; or 777 (d)(c)âA Any photograph of an individual a person solely as 778 a member of the public if the individual and where such person 779 is not named or otherwise identified in or in connection with 780 the use of the such photograph. 781 (7)(5)âAn No action may not shall be brought under this 782 section by reason of a any publication, printing, display, or 783 other public use of the name, portrait, photograph, image, or 784 other likeness of an individual a person occurring more than 785 after the expiration of 40 years from and after the death of the 786 individual such person. 787 (6)âAs used in this section, a personâs âsurviving spouseâ 788 is the personâs surviving spouse under the law of her or his 789 domicile at the time of her or his death, whether or not the 790 spouse has later remarried; and a personâs âchildrenâ are her or 791 his immediate offspring and any children legally adopted by the 792 person. Any consent provided for in subsection (1) shall be 793 given on behalf of a minor by the guardian of her or his person 794 or by either parent. 795 (8)(7)âThe remedies provided for in this section are shall 796 be in addition to and not in limitation of the remedies and 797 rights of any person under the common law against the invasion 798 of her or his privacy. 799 Section 11.âSubsection (21) is added to section 1002.42, 800 Florida Statutes, to read: 801 1002.42âPrivate schools.â 802 (21)âARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE INSTRUCTIONAL TOOLS.âA private 803 school that provides student access to an artificial 804 intelligence instructional tool, as defined in s. 1006.1495, 805 must comply with the provisions in that section. 806 Section 12.âSection 1006.1495, Florida Statutes, is created 807 to read: 808 1006.1495âArtificial intelligence instructional tools; 809 parental notice, opt-out, and account access.â 810 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 811 (a)ââArtificial intelligence instructional toolâ means a 812 software application or service that uses artificial 813 intelligence, including machine learning, which is made 814 available to a student by an educational entity for educational 815 purposes, including instruction, tutoring, practice, feedback, 816 or completing educator-directed assignments, and that is not 817 designed, marketed, or configured to: 818 1.âMeet a studentâs social needs; 819 2.âSimulate friendship, companionship, or an emotional 820 relationship with a student; or 821 3.âEmploy relationship-building or anthropomorphic design 822 features for the purpose of encouraging a student to continue 823 interacting with the system. 824 (b)ââEducational entityâ means a school district, a public 825 school, or a private school. The term includes a VPK provider 826 meaning a private prekindergarten provider or a public school 827 prekindergarten provider, as those terms are defined in s. 828 1002.51, which delivers the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education 829 Program under part V of chapter 1002. 830 (c)ââOperatorâ means a person who operates an artificial 831 intelligence instructional tool and collects, receives, 832 maintains, or uses student information or student-generated 833 content through the tool. 834 (d)ââParentâ includes a parent, guardian, or other person 835 with legal authority to make educational decisions for a 836 student. 837 (e)ââPrivate schoolâ has the same meaning as in s. 838 1002.01(3). 839 (f)ââPublic schoolâ means a component described in s. 840 1000.04(2), (4), (5), or (6). 841 (2)âRESTRICTION.âAn educational entity may not provide 842 students with access to an artificial intelligence instructional 843 tool before grade 6 unless such use is: 844 (a)âDirected and supervised by school personnel; 845 (b)âFor translation or similar support necessary for a 846 student identified as an English language learner; or 847 (c)âFor accommodations, assistive technology, or similar 848 support necessary for a student with a documented disability. 849 (3)âEDUCATIONAL USE; PARENTAL NOTICE.âBefore a student is 850 provided access credentials for an artificial intelligence 851 instructional tool, the educational entity must provide the 852 parent of a minor student with notice that: 853 (a)âIdentifies the tool and its educational purpose; 854 (b)âDescribes, in general terms, the manner in which the 855 tool will be used by students; 856 (c)âExplains how the parent may exercise the opt-out 857 process under subsection (4); and 858 (d)âExplains how the parent may access the studentâs 859 account or request access to information and account activity 860 under subsection (5), including the method for submitting a 861 written request. 862 (4)âPARENTAL OPT-OUT.â 863 (a)âA parent of a minor student must be provided the 864 opportunity to opt out of the studentâs use of an artificial 865 intelligence instructional tool. 866 (b)âThe opt-out process must align with the educational 867 entityâs existing policies for parental notice, consent, 868 objection, or opt out for instructional materials, digital 869 tools, or online accounts, as applicable. 870 (c)âIf a parent opts out of a studentâs use of an 871 artificial intelligence instructional tool and the student is 872 enrolled in a public school, the school district or public 873 school must provide an alternative instructional activity that 874 allows the student to meet a comparative educational requirement 875 without penalty. 876 (5)âPARENT ACCOUNT ACCESS; COMPLIANCE OPTIONS.â 877 (a)âAt the time an operator provides a studentâs access 878 credentials or otherwise provides or enables student access to 879 an educational entity for an artificial intelligence 880 instructional tool, the operator shall simultaneously provide to 881 the educational entity a means to authorize the parent of a 882 minor student to access information and account activity 883 maintained within the artificial intelligence instructional 884 tool. 885 (b)âThe operator may satisfy paragraph (a) by: 886 1.âProviding the parent of a minor student credentials or 887 another method for read-only access to the studentâs account; or 888 2.âUpon written request from the parent of a minor student, 889 providing access to the information and account activity 890 maintained within the tool, in accordance with applicable state 891 and federal law, within 30 days after receipt of the request. 892 The educational entity shall inform the parent of the right to 893 make such a request and the method for submitting the request. 894 (c)âIf an educational entity satisfies subparagraph (b)1., 895 the educational entity must provide the credentials or other 896 access method at the time the educational entity provides the 897 student with access credentials or otherwise enables student 898 access. 899 (d)âThis subsection does not require an operator or 900 educational entity to create or retain a transcript or record of 901 student interactions beyond information otherwise maintained in 902 the ordinary course of providing access to the tool. 903 (6)âCONSTRUCTION.âThis section does not alter: 904 (a)âA parentâs rights under state or federal law to access 905 student education records; or 906 (b)âAn educational entityâs obligations under applicable 907 state and federal student privacy laws. 908 Section 13.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 909 made by this act to section 540.08, Florida Statutes, in a 910 reference thereto, section 540.10, Florida Statutes, is 911 reenacted to read: 912 540.10âExemption of news media from liability.âNo relief 913 may be obtained under s. 540.08 or s. 540.09, against any 914 broadcaster, publisher or distributor broadcasting, publishing 915 or distributing paid advertising matter by radio or television 916 or in a newspaper, magazine, or similar periodical without 917 knowledge or notice that any consent required by s. 540.08 or s. 918 540.09, in connection with such advertising matter has not been 919 obtained, except an injunction against the presentation of such 920 advertising matter in future broadcasts or in future issues of 921 such newspaper, magazine, or similar periodical. 922 Section 14.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 923 made by this act to section 540.08, Florida Statutes, in a 924 reference thereto, paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 925 743.08, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 926 743.08âRemoval of disabilities of minors; artistic or 927 creative services; professional sports contracts; judicial 928 approval.â 929 (1)âA contract made by a minor or made by a parent or 930 guardian of a minor, or a contract proposed to be so made, may 931 be approved by the probate division of the circuit court or any 932 other division of the circuit court that has guardianship 933 jurisdiction, where the minor is a resident of this state or the 934 services of the minor are to be performed or rendered in this 935 state, where the contract sought to be approved is one under 936 which: 937 (c)âThe minor will endorse a product or service, or in any 938 other way receive compensation for the use of right of publicity 939 of the minor as that right is defined by s. 540.08. 940 Section 15.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.